Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1287
Records of justice of the peace; how proved.

The official certificate of a justice of the peace of any of the United States, to any judgment, and the preliminary proceeding before him, supported by the official certificate of the clerk of any court of record within the county in which such justice resides, stating that he is an acting justice of the peace of that county, and that the signature of his certificate is genuine, is sufficient evidence of such proceedings and judgment.

R.S.1867, Code § 415, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 7980;

C.S.1922, § 8921;

C.S.1929, § 20-1287;

R.S.1943, § 25-1287.

Transcript of justice of peace of another state is receivable in evidence if it complies with this section. Gordon Bros. v. Wageman, 77 Neb. 185, 108 N.W. 1067 (1906).